en: Fishing Reel Bags & Cases
xx: Fishing Reel Bags & Cases
cs: Brašny a pouzdra na rybářské navijáky
da: Tasker og kasser til fiskehjul
de: Taschen & Behälter
es: Bolsas y estuches para carretes de pesca
fr: Sacs et étuis pour moulinets
it: Borse e custodie per mulinelli da pesca
ja: 釣り用リールケース
nl: Tassen en koffers voor vismolens
no: Vesker og bokser for fiskesneller
pl: Torby i pokrowce na kołowrotki wędkarskie
pt: Estojos e sacolas para carretilha
ru: Сумки и чехлы для рыболовных катушек
sv: Väskor och askar för spinnrullar
tr: Olta Makarası Çantaları ve Kutuları

en: Fishing Reel Lubricants
xx: Fishing Reel Lubricants
cs: Maziva na rybářské navijáky
da: Smørelse til fiskehjul
de: Schmierstoffe
es: Lubricantes para carretes de pesca
fr: Lubrifiants pour moulinets
it: Lubrificanti per mulinelli da pesca
ja: リール用潤滑剤
nl: Smeermiddelen voor vismolens
no: Smøremidler for fiskesneller
pl: Smary do kołowrotków wędkarskich
pt: Lubrificantes para carretilha
ru: Смазка для рыболовных катушек
sv: Smörjmedel för spinnrullar
tr: Olta Makarası Yağları

en: Fishing Reel Replacement Spools
xx: Fishing Reel Replacement Spools
cs: Náhradní cívky na rybářské navijáky
da: Erstatningsspoler til fiskehjul
de: Ersatzspulen
es: Bobinas de recambio para carretes de pesca
fr: Bobines de rechange pour moulinets
it: Bobina sostitutiva per mulinelli da pesca
ja: 交換用スプール
nl: Vervangende spoelen voor vismolens
no: Reservespoler for fiskesneller
pl: Szpule zapasowe do kołowrotków wędkarskich
pt: Carretilhas para reposição
ru: Сменные рыболовные катушки
sv: Ersättningsspolar för spinnrullar
tr: Olta Makarası Yedek Sargıları

en: Fishing Reels
xx: Fishing Reels
cs: Rybářské navijáky
da: Fiskehjul
de: Angelrollen
es: Carretes de pesca
fr: Moulinets, Moulinet de canne à pêche
it: Mulinelli da pesca
ja: 釣り用リール
nl: Haspels
no: Fiskesneller
pl: Kołowrotki wędkarskie
pt: Carretéis de pesca
ru: Рыболовные катушки
sv: Fiskerullar
tr: Olta Makineleri

en: Fishing Rod Accessories
xx: Fishing Rod Accessories
cs: Rybářské pruty – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til fiskestænger
de: Angelruten-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para cañas de pescar
fr: Accessoires pour cannes à pêche
it: Accessori per canne da pesca
ja: 釣り竿関連用品
nl: Hengelaccessoires
no: Tilbehør til fiskestenger
pl: Akcesoria do wędek
pt: Acessórios para vara de pescar
ru: Принадлежности для удочек
sv: Tillbehör till metspön
tr: Olta Çubuğu Aksesuarları

en: Fishing Rod Bags & Cases
xx: Fishing Rod Bags & Cases
cs: Brašny a pouzdra na rybářské pruty
da: Tasker og kasser til fiskestænger
de: Taschen & Behälter für Angelruten
es: Bolsas y estuches para cañas de pescar
fr: Sacs et étuis pour cannes à pêche
it: Custodie e borse per canne da pesca
ja: 釣り竿ケース
nl: Hengeltassen en -kokers
no: Bager og bokser til fiskestenger
pl: Torby i pokrowce na wędki
pt: Estojos e sacolas para vara de pescar
ru: Сумки и чехлы для удочек
sv: Väskor och fodral till metspön
tr: Olta Çubuğu Çantaları ve Kutuları

en: Fishing Rod Holders & Storage Racks
xx: Fishing Rod Holders & Storage Racks
cs: Stojánky a držáky na pruty
da: Fiskestangsholdere og -opbevaringsstativer
de: Angelrutenhalter und -ständer
es: Contenedores de almacenamiento para cañas de pescar
fr: Stands et racks pour cannes à pêche
it: Sostegni e rastrelliere per canne da pesca
ja: 釣り竿ホルダー、釣り竿保管ラック
nl: Hengelsteunen en -rekken
no: Fiskestangholdere og -stativer
pl: Stojaki i wieszaki na wędki
pt: Suporte para vara de pescar e racks de armazenamento
ru: Подставки и стеллажи для удочек
sv: Spöhållare och spöställ
tr: Olta Çubuğu Çantaları ve Kayar Çekmeceler

en: Fishing Rods
xx: Fishing Rods
cs: Rybářské pruty
da: Fiskestænger
de: Angelruten
es: Cañas de pescar
fr: Cannes à pêche, Canne à pêche
it: Canne da pesca
ja: 釣り竿
nl: Vishengels
no: Fiskestenger
pl: Wędki
pt: Varas de pescar
ru: Удочки
sv: Metspön
tr: Olta Kamışları

en: Fishing Spears
xx: Fishing Spears
cs: Rybářské oštěpy
da: Fiskespyd
de: Harpunen für den Angelsport
es: Arpones
fr: Harpons de pêche
it: Fiocine
ja: 釣り用スピアー
nl: Vissperen
no: Fiskespyd
pl: Harpuny
pt: Lanças para pesca
ru: Рыболовные копья
sv: Fiskespjut
tr: Zıpkınlar

en: Fishing Tackle
xx: Fishing Tackle
cs: Rybářská výstroj
da: Fiskegrej
de: Angelgeräte
es: Artes de pesca
fr: Matériel de pêche
it: Attrezzatura da pesca
ja: 釣り用タックル
nl: Vistuig
no: Fiskeredskap
pl: Przybory wędkarskie
pt: Equipamento de pesca
ru: Рыболовные снасти
sv: Fiskedon
tr: Olta Takımı

en: Fishing Baits & Lures
xx: Fishing Baits & Lures
cs: Rybářské návnady
da: Fiskelokkemidler
de: Kunstköder
es: Cebos de pesca
fr: Leurres et appâts pour la pêche
it: Esche e richiami da pesca
ja: 釣り用ベイト・ルアー
nl: Visaas en lokaas
no: Fiskesluker og -kroker
pl: Przynęty
pt: Iscas de pesca
ru: Наживка и приманка для рыбной ловли
sv: Fiskedrag
tr: Balık Yemleri ve Tuzakları

en: Fishing Floats
xx: Fishing Floats
cs: Rybářské splávky
da: Fiskeflydere
de: Schwimmer
es: Flotadores de pesca
fr: Flotteurs pour la pêche
it: Galleggianti da pesca
ja: 釣り用浮き
nl: Dobbers
no: Fiskedupper
pl: Przynęty pływające
pt: Boias para pescaria
ru: Рыболовные поплавки
sv: Flöten
tr: Olta Mantarları

en: Fishing Hooks
xx: Fishing Hooks
cs: Rybářské háčky
da: Fiskekroge
de: Angelhaken
es: Anzuelos de pesca
fr: Hameçons
it: Ami da pesca
ja: 釣り針
nl: Vishaken
no: Fiskekroker
pl: Haczyki wędkarskie
pt: Anzóis para pesca
ru: Рыболовные крючки
sv: Metkrokar
tr: Olta İğneleri

en: Fishing Sinkers
xx: Fishing Sinkers
cs: Rybářská závaží
da: Fiskelod
de: Angelblei
es: Plomos de pesca
fr: Plombs pour la pêche
it: Piombi da pesca
ja: 釣り用おもり
nl: Zinklood
no: Fiskelodd
pl: Ciężarki wędkarskie
pt: Pesos para pescaria
ru: Рыболовные грузила
sv: Fiskesänken
tr: Olta Kurşunları

en: Fishing Snaps & Swivels
xx: Fishing Snaps & Swivels
cs: Rybářské karabinky a obratlíky
da: Fæstnere til fiskeri
de: Karabiner & Wirbel
es: Mosquetones
fr: Agrafes et émerillons pour la pêche
it: Anelli e girelle da pesca
ja: 釣り用スナップ・スイベル
nl: Karabijnhaken en wartels voor hengels
no: Svivler og splittringer til fiske
pl: Przypony
pt: Destorcedor para pesca
ru: Рыболовные застежки и вертлюги
sv: Beteslås och lekande
tr: Balık Agrafları ve Fırdöndüleri

en: Fishing Traps
xx: Fishing Traps
cs: Vrše na ryby
da: Fiskefælder
de: Fallen für den Angelsport
es: Trampas de pesca
fr: Nasses de pêche
it: Trappole da pesca
ja: 釣りトラップ
nl: Visfuiken
no: Fiskeruser
pl: Więcierze
pt: Armadilhas para pesca
ru: Рыболовные садки
sv: Fiskfällor
tr: Livarlar

en: Fly Tying Materials
xx: Fly Tying Materials
cs: Materiály na vázání mušek
da: Materialer til fluebinding
de: Köderbefestigung
es: Materiales para el atado de moscas
fr: Matériaux de montage de mouches
it: Materiali per pesca con la mosca
ja: フライタイイング用素材
nl: Bevestigingsmateriaal voor kunstvliegen
no: Materialer til fluebinding
pl: Materiały do wiązania przynęty
pt: Materias para confecção de moscas artificiais
ru: Материалы для вязания мушек
sv: Flugbindningsmaterial
tr: Böcek Bağlama Malzemeleri

en: Fishing Beads
xx: Fishing Beads
cs: Korálky na rybaření
da: Fiskeperler
de: Pop-Up-Kugeln
es: Cuentas para pescar
fr: Perles pour la pêche
it: Perline da pesca
ja: 仕掛け用ビーズ
nl: Viskraaltjes
no: Fiskeperler
pl: Koraliki wędkarskie
pt: Miçangas de pesca
ru: Рыболовные бусы
sv: Fiskepärlor
tr: Olta Boncukları

en: Fishing Yarn
xx: Fishing Yarn
cs: Rybářská příze
da: Fiskegarn
de: Angelschnur
es: Hilos de pesca
fr: Fil de pêche
it: Filo da pesca
ja: 釣り糸
nl: Vislijnen
no: Fluebindergarn
pl: Plecionka wędkarska
pt: Boias de pesca
ru: Рыболовная пряжа
sv: Fiskegarn
tr: Olta İpleri

en: Live Bait
xx: Live Bait
cs: Živá návnada
da: Levende madding
de: Lebendköder
es: Cebos vivos
fr: Appâts vivants
it: Esche vive
ja: 生餌
nl: Levend aas
no: Levende agn
pl: Żywa przynęta
pt: Isca viva
ru: Живая приманка
sv: Levande bete
tr: Canlı Yemler